Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.040

Application for warehouse license.

Application for a license to operate a warehouse under the provisions of this chapter shall be on a form prescribed by the department and shall include:

(1) The full name of the person applying for the license and whether the applicant is an individual, partnership, association, corporation, or other entity;

(2) The full name of each member of the firm or partnership, or the names of the officers of the company, society, cooperative association, or corporation;

(3) The principal business address of the applicant in the state and elsewhere;

(4) The name or names of the person or persons authorized to receive and accept service of summons and legal notices of all kinds for the applicant;

(5) Whether the applicant has also applied for or has been issued a grain dealer license under the provisions of this chapter;

(6) The location of each warehouse the applicant intends to operate and the location of the headquarters or main office of the applicant;

(7) The bushel storage capacity of each such warehouse to be licensed;

(8) The schedule of fees to be charged at each warehouse for the handling, conditioning, storage, and shipment of all commodities during the licensing period;

(9) A financial statement to determine the net worth of the applicant to determine whether or not the applicant meets the minimum net worth requirements established by the director pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. All financial statement information required by this subsection shall be confidential information not subject to public disclosure;

(10) Whether the application is for a terminal, subterminal, or country warehouse license;

(11) Whether the applicant has previously been denied a grain dealer or warehouse operator license or whether the applicant has had either license suspended or revoked by the department;

(12) Any other reasonable information the department finds necessary to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 600; 1987 c 393 s 17; 1983 c 305 s 20; 1979 ex.s. c 238 s 13; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 21; 1963 c 124 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.